Missouri, session 2026, SB1649.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 211.061, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 211.061,
to read as follows:
211.061. 1. When a child is taken into custody with
or without warrant for an offense, the child, together with
any information concerning the child and the personal
property found in the child's possession, shall be taken
immediately and directly before the juvenile court or
delivered to the juvenile officer or person acting for the
child.
2. If any person is taken before a circuit or
associate circuit judge not assigned to juvenile court or a
municipal judge, and it is then, or at any time thereafter,
ascertained that he or she was under the age of eighteen
years at the time he or she is alleged to have committed the
offense, or that he or she is subject to the jurisdiction of
the juvenile court as provided by this chapter, it is the
duty of the judge forthwith to transfer the case or refer
the matter to the juvenile court, and direct the delivery of
such person, together with information concerning him or her

SB 1649 2
and the personal property found in his or her possession, to
the juvenile officer or person acting as such.
3. When the juvenile court is informed that a child is
in detention it shall examine the reasons therefor and shall
immediately:
(1) Order the child released; or
(2) Order the child continued in detention until a
detention hearing is held. An order to continue the child
in detention shall only be entered upon the filing of a
petition or motion to modify and a determination by the
court that probable cause exists to believe that the child
has committed acts specified in the petition or motion that
bring the child within the jurisdiction of the court under
subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031.
4. (1) A juvenile shall not remain in detention for a
period greater than twenty-four hours unless the court
orders a detention hearing. If such hearing is not held
within three days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal
holidays, the juvenile shall be released from detention
unless the court for good cause orders the hearing
continued. The detention hearing shall be held within the
judicial circuit at a date, time and place convenient to the
court. Notice of the date, time and place of a detention
hearing, and of the right to counsel, shall be given to the
juvenile and his or her custodian in person, by telephone,
or by such other expeditious method as is available.
(2) The detention hearing shall be held on the record
and is subject to the same procedural and substantive rules
as a preliminary hearing in a criminal prosecution.
(3) The court shall first inform the juvenile of the
juvenile's right to counsel, including the right to
appointed counsel under section 211.211.

SB 1649 3
(4) The court shall receive evidence as to whether
there is probable cause to believe an offense has been
committed and the juvenile has committed it. The court
shall also receive evidence relevant to the necessity for
detention of the juvenile. Any written reports or social
records to be offered to the court at the detention hearing
shall be made available to all parties at or prior to the
hearing.
(5) The juvenile shall not be detained unless the
court finds that:
(a) There is probable cause to believe an offense has
been committed and the juvenile has committed it; and
(b) Detention is required:
a. To protect the juvenile;
b. To protect persons or property of others;
c. Because the juvenile may flee or be removed from
the jurisdiction of the court;
d. Because the juvenile has no parent, guardian or
custodian, or other suitable person able or willing to
provide care and supervision for the juvenile and return the
juvenile to court when required; or
e. Because the juvenile is a fugitive from another
jurisdiction and an official of that jurisdiction has
requested the juvenile be detained pending return to that
jurisdiction.
✓